src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.aff
SFX Q 0 ямсиз-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизам [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанларми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанлар-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанлар-чи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанлар-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанлардир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанлар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанлардир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанлармикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанлар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсанларам [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизларми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизлар-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизлар-чи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизлар-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизлардир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизлар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизлардир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизлармикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизлар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямсизларам [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямларми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямлар-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямлар-чи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямлар-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямлардир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямлар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямлардир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямлармикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямлар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 ямларам [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммас [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммаски [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммас-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммас-чи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммас-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасдир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммас-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасдир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммас-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасам [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасман [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасманки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасманми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасман-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасман-чи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасман-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмандир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасман-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмандир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасманмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасман-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасманам [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмиз [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмизми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмиз-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмиз-чи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмиз-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмиздир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмиз-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмиздир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмизмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмиз-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасмизам [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассан-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассан-чи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассан-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассандир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассан-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассандир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассан-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанам [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассиз [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассиз-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассиз-чи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассиз-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассиздир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассиз-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассиздир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассиз-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизам [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанларми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанлар-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанлар-чи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанлар-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанлардир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанлар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанлардир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанлармикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанлар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассанларам [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизларми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизлар-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизлар-чи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизлар-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизлардир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизлар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизлардир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизлармикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизлар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммассизларам [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммаслар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасларми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммаслар-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммаслар-чи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммаслар-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммаслардир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммаслар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммаслардир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммаслармикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммаслар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX Q 0 яммасларам [аеёиоуўэюя]

SFX R Y 93
SFX R 0 ки [^ь]
SFX R 0 ми [^ь]
SFX R 0 -ку [^ь]
SFX R 0 -чи [^ь]
SFX R 0 -да [^ь]
SFX R 0 дир [^ь]
SFX R 0 -ов [^ь]
SFX R 0 дир-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 микан [^ь]
SFX R 0 ман [^ь]
SFX R 0 манки [^ь]
SFX R 0 манми [^ь]
SFX R 0 ман-ку [^ь]
SFX R 0 ман-чи [^ь]
SFX R 0 ман-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 мандир [^ь]
SFX R 0 ман-ов [^ь]
SFX R 0 мандир-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 манмикан [^ь]
SFX R 0 ман-у [^ь]
SFX R 0 манам [^ь]
SFX R 0 миз [^ь]
SFX R 0 мизки [^ь]
SFX R 0 мизми [^ь]
SFX R 0 миз-ку [^ь]
SFX R 0 миз-чи [^ь]
SFX R 0 миз-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 миздир [^ь]
SFX R 0 миз-ов [^ь]
SFX R 0 миздир-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 мизмикан [^ь]
SFX R 0 миз-у [^ь]
SFX R 0 мизам [^ь]
SFX R 0 сан [^ь]
SFX R 0 санки [^ь]
SFX R 0 санми [^ь]
SFX R 0 сан-ку [^ь]
SFX R 0 сан-чи [^ь]
SFX R 0 сан-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 сандир [^ь]
SFX R 0 сан-ов [^ь]
SFX R 0 сандир-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 санмикан [^ь]
SFX R 0 сан-у [^ь]
SFX R 0 санам [^ь]
SFX R 0 сиз [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизки [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизми [^ь]
SFX R 0 сиз-ку [^ь]
SFX R 0 сиз-чи [^ь]
SFX R 0 сиз-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 сиздир [^ь]
SFX R 0 сиз-ов [^ь]
SFX R 0 сиздир-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизмикан [^ь]
SFX R 0 сиз-у [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизам [^ь]
SFX R 0 санлар [^ь]
SFX R 0 санларки [^ь]
SFX R 0 санларми [^ь]
SFX R 0 санлар-ку [^ь]
SFX R 0 санлар-чи [^ь]
SFX R 0 санлар-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 санлардир [^ь]
SFX R 0 санлар-ов [^ь]
SFX R 0 санлардир-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 санлармикан [^ь]
SFX R 0 санлар-у [^ь]
SFX R 0 санларам [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизлар [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизларки [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизларми [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизлар-ку [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизлар-чи [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизлар-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизлардир [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизлар-ов [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизлардир-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизлармикан [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизлар-у [^ь]
SFX R 0 сизларам [^ь]
SFX R 0 лар [^ь]
SFX R 0 ларки [^ь]
SFX R 0 ларми [^ь]
SFX R 0 лар-ку [^ь]
SFX R 0 лар-чи [^ь]
SFX R 0 лар-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 лардир [^ь]
SFX R 0 лар-ов [^ь]
SFX R 0 лардир-да [^ь]
SFX R 0 лармикан [^ь]
SFX R 0 лар-у [^ь]
SFX R 0 ларам [^ь]
