src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
Абду/ABVIJKLMQST
Абдусатторов/ABVIJKLMQS
абстиненция/ACVIJKLMQS
авиабомба/ACVIJKLMQS
аворижа/ACVIJKLMQS
автол/ABVIJKLMQS
автоспоралар/ABVIJKLMQS
агитвагон/ABVIJKLMQS
агротехника/ACVIJKLMQS
аденокарценома/ACVIJKLMQS
адъютантлик/AEVIJKLMQS
ажрашувчи/ACVIJKLMQS
азометин/ABVIJKLMQS
айирув/ABVIJKLMQS
айтганчалик/AEVIJKLMQS
аквилон/ABVIJKLMQS
аксирик/AEVIJKLMQS
акция/ACVIJKLMQS
албинизм/ABVIJKLMQS
Алишеров/ABVIJKLMQS
аллил/ABVIJKLMQS
алуштит/ABVIJKLMQS
американча/ACVIJKLMQS
анаконда/ACVIJKLMQS
ангров/ABVIJKLMQS
анкета/ACVIJKLMQS
апогей/ABVIJKLMQS
ар-ар/ABVIJKLMQS
ариқча/ACVIJKLMQS
арраланиш/ABVIJKLMQS
арчагуллилар/ABVIJKLMQS
аслан/ABVIJKLMQS
астағфирулло/AFVIJKLMQS
атир/ABVIJKLMQS
афсар/ABVIJKLMQS
аҳил/ABVIJKLMQS
ашё/AFVIJKLMQS
аяниш/ABVIJKLMQS
бадкирдор/ABVIJKLMQS
базилика/ACVIJKLMQS
бақбақадор/ABVIJKLMQS
бальзамли/ACVIJKLMQS
баралла/ACVIJKLMQS
бартолинит/ABVIJKLMQS
баҳаво/AFVIJKLMQS
баян/ABVIJKLMQS
беда/ACVIJKLMQS
безиёлик/AEVIJKLMQS
беқасамфуруш/ABVIJKLMQS
бемеҳрона/ACVIJKLMQS
бери/ACVIJKLMQS
беташвиш/ABVIJKLMQS
беҳислик/AEVIJKLMQS
библиотека/ACVIJKLMQS
билдиртирув/ABVIJKLMQS
биоген/ABVIJKLMQS
бирикма/ACVIJKLMQS
бицилиндрика/ACVIJKLMQS
боғишамоллик/AEVIJKLMQS
бой-бўй/ABVIJKLMQS
болиғ/ABVIJKLMQS
босқин/ABVIJKLMQS
бошлаб/ABVIJKLMQS
Бруней/ABVIJKLMQS
будка/ACVIJKLMQS
бўйинтумор/ABVIJKLMQS
булбулзор/ABVIJKLMQS
булутланув/ABVIJKLMQS
буришма/ACVIJKLMQS
бутилен/ABVIJKLMQS
бўяшлик/AEVIJKLMQS
ваколатхона/ACVIJKLMQS
вандал/ABVIJKLMQS
Вафо/ABVIJKLMQST
венгерча/ACVIJKLMQS
виз/ABVIJKLMQS
вожатий/ABVIJKLMQS
вульгар/ABVIJKLMQS
Гайана/ACVIJKLMQS
гапсотар/ABVIJKLMQS
гектарлаб/ABVIJKLMQS
геополигон/ABVIJKLMQS
гидровентилятор/ABVIJKLMQS
гиламфуруш/ABVIJKLMQS
гистолог/ABVIJKLMQS
гранитоид/ABVIJKLMQS
гузарнишинлик/AEVIJKLMQS
гуманистик/AEVIJKLMQS
гуруҳ/ABVIJKLMQS
ғаллачилик/AEVIJKLMQS
ғолибият/ABVIJKLMQS
давомлилик/AEVIJKLMQS
далдаланиш/ABVIJKLMQS
даранглатиш/ABVIJKLMQS
дарров-дарров/ABVIJKLMQS
даҳбоши/ACVIJKLMQS
деворкашлик/AEVIJKLMQS
декларант/ABVIJKLMQS
деполяризатор/ABVIJKLMQS
диалект/ABVIJKLMQS
диктовка/ACVIJKLMQS
димоғ/ABVIJKLMQS
дискли/AHVIJKLMQS
доғли/AHVIJKLMQS
донесклик/AEVIJKLMQS
дубзор/ABVIJKLMQS
думбалоқчи/ACVIJKLMQS
дуррача/ACVIJKLMQS
егизув/ABVIJKLMQS
ёзлик/AEVIJKLMQS
ёлғизқўллик/AEVIJKLMQS
ёмғирсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
ёпиқлик/AEVIJKLMQS
ертўла/ACVIJKLMQS
ёхуд/ABVIJKLMQS
жадидчи/ACVIJKLMQS
жанг-сурон/ABVIJKLMQS
Жаҳонгирова/ACVIJKLMQS
жилвир/ABVIJKLMQS
жирлов/ABVIJKLMQS
жонсизланиш/ABVIJKLMQS
жунунли/ACVIJKLMQS
заифлик/AEVIJKLMQS
запонка/ACVIJKLMQS
зарядлаш/ABVIJKLMQS
Зиёдович/ABVIJKLMQS
зирқиров/ABVIJKLMQS
зоҳидлик/AEVIJKLMQS
иборапардоз/ABVIJKLMQS
ижара/ACVIJKLMQS
изоляцион/ABVIJKLMQS
иқлимлашиш/ABVIJKLMQS
иллат/ABVIJKLMQS
имиқ/ADVIJKLMQS
ингаламоқ/ADVIJKLMQS
инновацион/ABVIJKLMQS
интизомсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
ирғайзорлик/AEVIJKLMQS
исковуч/ABVIJKLMQS
истибдод/ABVIJKLMQS
итялоқ/ADVIJKLMQS
ички/ACVIJKLMQS
ишонтирув/ABVIJKLMQS
йиғиштириб-қоқиштириб/ABVIJKLMQS
йўқланди/ACVIJKLMQS
йўрттирув/ABVIJKLMQS
кайф/ABVIJKLMQS
калтабўғинлик/AEVIJKLMQS
камлитраж/ABVIJKLMQS
канизлик/AEVIJKLMQS
кардиограф/ABVIJKLMQS
карч/ABVIJKLMQS
катталаштиргич/ABVIJKLMQS
квартал/ABVIJKLMQS
келимсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
кенгяпроқли/AHVIJKLMQS
кесишма/ACVIJKLMQS
кечроқ/ADVIJKLMQS
кинна/ACVIJKLMQS
Кирибати/AFVIJKLMQS
кичраюв/ABVIJKLMQS
коврижка/ACVIJKLMQS
кома/ACVIJKLMQS
конвейерчи/ACVIJKLMQS
контр-адмирал/ABVIJKLMQS
корнетчи/ACVIJKLMQS
кофурий/ABVIJKLMQS
кувлов/ABVIJKLMQS
кулувчанлик/AEVIJKLMQS
куракфурушлик/AEVIJKLMQS
кучланишли/AHVIJKLMQS
қанора/ACVIJKLMQS
қийинди/ACVIJKLMQS
қоматли/AHVIJKLMQS
қуёшли/AHVIJKLMQS
қусурли/AHVIJKLMQS
ламаркизм/ABVIJKLMQS
лимитлаштириш/ABVIJKLMQS
луқмонлик/AEVIJKLMQS
мажнунворона/ACVIJKLMQS
мактабхона/ACVIJKLMQS
маорифчилик/AEVIJKLMQS
Матмуса/ACVIJKLMQST
маънавиятли/AHVIJKLMQS
метин/ABVIJKLMQS
милитаризм/ABVIJKLMQS
мисқозон/ABVIJKLMQS
моноплан/ABVIJKLMQS
муддатсизлик/AEVIJKLMQS
мумтозлик/AEVIJKLMQS
мутахассислик/AEVIJKLMQS
навниҳол/ABVIJKLMQS
намиққанлик/AEVIJKLMQS
нафланиш/ABVIJKLMQS
нигин/ABVIJKLMQS
новдагул/ABVIJKLMQS
нонтепки/ACVIJKLMQS
нур-зиё/AFVIJKLMQS
овсар/ABVIJKLMQS
озгина-озгина/ACVIJKLMQS
оқлик-кўклик/AEVIJKLMQS
олтин/ABVIJKLMQS
ораланиш/ABVIJKLMQS
осувчи/ACVIJKLMQS
очиқдан-очиқ/ADVIJKLMQS
палос/ABVIJKLMQS
парникчи/ACVIJKLMQS
пашшача/ACVIJKLMQS
пирқиратиш/ABVIJKLMQS
поғона/ACVIJKLMQS
портловчи/ACVIJKLMQS
процессор/ABVIJKLMQS
радикализм/ABVIJKLMQS
раскладушка/ACVIJKLMQS
резгичи/ACVIJKLMQS
ринология/ACVIJKLMQS
руҳлантирувчилик/AEVIJKLMQS
сазоворона/ACVIJKLMQS
Самойленко/AFVIJKLMQS
саркашлик/AEVIJKLMQS
севимли/AHVIJKLMQS
серғавғо/AFVIJKLMQS
сидқ/ABVIJKLMQS
синус/ABVIJKLMQS
соатсозлик/AEVIJKLMQS
сомсачи/ACVIJKLMQS
старшина/ACVIJKLMQS
суғурма/ACVIJKLMQS
сўнгак/AEVIJKLMQS
суҳбатдошлик/AEVIJKLMQS
таёқ/ADVIJKLMQS
талабчанлик/AEVIJKLMQS
таомхўр/ABVIJKLMQS
татар/ABVIJKLMQS
таъсирсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
телефон/ABVIJKLMQS
террорчилик/AEVIJKLMQS
тиллақўнғиз/ABVIJKLMQS
титкилаш/ABVIJKLMQS
толача/ACVIJKLMQS
тотув/ABVIJKLMQS
тугалланмаслик/AEVIJKLMQS
тукдор/ABVIJKLMQS
тўнтош/ABVIJKLMQS
тўртамал/ABVIJKLMQS
Убай/ABVIJKLMQST
ўзибўларчилик/AEVIJKLMQS
ўй-хаёл/ABVIJKLMQS
улуғвор/ABVIJKLMQS
ўргимчак/AEVIJKLMQS
устама/ACVIJKLMQS
участка/ACVIJKLMQS
файласуфнамо/AFVIJKLMQS
фаҳшлик/AEVIJKLMQS
флюороз/ABVIJKLMQS
фотоэтюд/ABVIJKLMQS
Хартум/ABVIJKLMQS
хирслик/AEVIJKLMQS
хосхона/ACVIJKLMQS
хуррам/ABVIJKLMQS
ҳазилвон/ABVIJKLMQS
ҳамон/ABVIJKLMQS
ҳожатхона/ACVIJKLMQS
ҳуркмоқлик/AEVIJKLMQS
чайнворд/ABVIJKLMQS
чапанилик/AEVIJKLMQS
чеча/ACVIJKLMQS
чиниққанлик/AEVIJKLMQS
чоптириш/ABVIJKLMQS
чўлималик/AEVIJKLMQS
шайтонковуш/ABVIJKLMQS
шатакчи/ACVIJKLMQS
шиқиллаш/ABVIJKLMQS
шихталаш/ABVIJKLMQS
шотомир/ABVIJKLMQS
Шўрчи/ACVIJKLMQS
экскурсоводлик/AEVIJKLMQS
Элшод/ABVIJKLMQST
эргашли/AHVIJKLMQS
этимолог/ABVIJKLMQS
юзли/AHVIJKLMQS
яғринли/AHVIJKLMQS
япалоқ/ADVIJKLMQS
